Tennessee, session 114, SB1044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 31, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a parent or guardian who wishes to
enroll the parent's or guardian's student into an LEA or public charter school shall submit
one (1) of the following documents to the LEA or public charter school upon enrollment
of the student:
(1) A copy of the student's birth certificate that lists a place of birth within
the United States or legal territories;
(2) A copy of a current voter registration issued to the parent or guardian
and the parent's or guardian's valid driver license or photo identification license;
(3) A copy of a United States passport issued to the student, parent, or
guardian; or
(4) A copy of a veterans affairs identification card, a United States
military identification, or a DD-214 issued to the parent or guardian.
(b) A parent or guardian of a student is not required to submit a document to an
LEA or public charter school under subsection (a) if:
(1) The parent or guardian has previously submitted a document
pursuant to subsection (a) to the LEA or public charter school; or
(2) The parent or guardian is employed by the LEA or public charter
school.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), a parent or guardian of a student
may register a student without presenting a document described in subsection (a) if the
- 2 - 002132

parent or guardian pays the LEA or public charter school in an amount equal to the
amount representing the per pupil state and local funds generated and required through
the Tennessee investment in student achievement formula for the LEA in which the
participating student resides.
(d) An LEA or public charter school shall maintain a record that a document
described in subsection (a) was submitted upon registration of a student. An LEA or
public charter school is not required to retain a copy of the document provided pursuant
to subsection (a).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3001, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a) Except as provided in SECTION 1, subsection (c) of this act, public schools
are free to all persons residing within the state who are above five (5) years of age, or
who will become five (5) years of age on or before August 15.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
- 3 - 002132